District of Columbia statutes.
6-1133

Duties of Advisory Board.

The Board shall:

(1)

Negotiate with the owners of the Rhodes Tavern to determine whether said owners will enter into an agreement to fulfill the objectives declared in § 6-1131. If the Board determines that such an agreement cannot be achieved, then the Board will prepare a report to the Mayor and the Council outlining actions that should be taken by the District of Columbia government to implement the policy declared in § 6-1131;

(2)

Prepare reports and information for the Mayor and Council concerning:

(A)

How Rhodes Tavern can be preserved, restored, reused, and integrated into any proposed development;

(B)

A complete documented history of Rhodes Tavern; and

(C)

Any other matter which the Board deems appropriate;

(3)

Prepare an application nominating Rhodes Tavern as a Category I Landmark on The District of Columbia’s Inventory of Historic Sites; and

(4)

Undertake any other activities which it determines are appropriate to achieve the objectives of the policy declared in § 6-1131.

Mar. 15, 1984, D.C. Law 5-69, § 4, 31 DCR 445
This section is referenced in § 6-1132.
1981 Ed., § 5-1023.